California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) “AHSC Housing Allocation” means the funding allocation described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code for the purposes of affordable housing and administered by the Housing Development and Finance Committee.

(b) “AHSC Sustainable Communities Allocation” means the funding allocation described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code for sustainable communities’ investments and administered by the Strategic Growth Council.

(c) “Committee”
 means the Housing Development and Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 54925 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Council” means the Strategic Growth Council established pursuant to Section 75121.

(e) “Disadvantaged communities” means communities identified as disadvantaged communities pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) “Legacy agreement” means any award, agreement, contract, or other legally binding commitment made under funding notices of the program issued before July 1, 2026.

(g) “Program” means the Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities Program established pursuant to Section 75210.

(h) “Program administrator” means either the committee or
 the council responsible for administering an allocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 259, Sec. 7.   (SB 193)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75200.2.

A program administrator may designate a state agency or department to manage allocations under the program for the disbursement of grants and loans to support the planning and development of affordable housing and sustainable communities consistent with this part and Sections 39719 and 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 29.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75200.3.

Moneys appropriated to the program pursuant to Section 39719 or 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code may be used by a state agency or department designated by a program administrator pursuant to Section 75200.2 for that state agency’s or department’s support and local assistance costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 30.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities Program [75210. - 75218.2.]

75210.

The Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities Program is hereby established to reduce greenhouse gas emissions through projects that implement land use, housing, transportation, and agricultural land preservation practices to support infill and compact development, and that support related and coordinated public policy objectives, including the following:

(a) Reducing air pollution.

(b) Improving conditions in disadvantaged communities.

(c) Supporting or improving public health and other cobenefits as described in Section 39712 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Improving connectivity and accessibility to jobs, housing, and services.

(e) Increasing options for mobility, including the implementation of the Active Transportation Program established pursuant to Section 2380 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(f) Increasing transit ridership.

(g) Preserving and developing affordable rental and owner-occupied housing for lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) Protecting
 agricultural lands to support infill development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 31.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75210.1.

Beginning with new funding rounds initiated after July 1, 2026, the moneys appropriated to the program shall be allocated as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code. The allocations shall be administered as follows:

(a) (1) The AHSC Housing Allocation shall be administered by the committee, with a focus on infill housing projects.

(2) The committee shall administer the allocation described in paragraph (1) in alignment with its responsibility in Section 54942 of the Health and Safety Code to coordinate a cohesive and integrated affordable housing finance system.

(3) In the initial program guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 75215, the committee shall establish allocation targets intended to encourage a substantial portion of the AHSC Housing Allocation funding to support projects that are located within proximity to, served by, or demonstrate substantial benefit from, transportation, active transportation, climate resilience, utility, community infrastructure, or other related public investments, including related investments funded through the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund and other state, regional, or local programs.

(4) In awarding funds under the AHSC Housing Allocation, the committee shall provide additional consideration to both of the following:

(A) Projects located within proximity to, served by, or demonstrating substantial benefit from, existing or planned transit,
 active transportation, utility, climate resilience, or other community-serving improvements funded through the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund or other state, regional, or local transportation, infrastructure, and sustainable community programs.

(B) Projects that are located near, served by, or coordinated with existing, planned, or previously funded climate-related public investments, including transportation, active transportation, climate resilience, transit-oriented development, and other community-serving infrastructure improvements.

(5) In awarding funds under the AHSC Housing Allocation, the committee may provide additional consideration to projects that maximize the utilization and public benefit of completed state, regional, and local investments related to transportation, active transportation, climate, and sustainable infrastructure programs, including investments funded
 through the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund.

(b) (1) The AHSC Sustainable Communities Allocation shall be administered by the council to support flexible infrastructure and community improvement investments that advance greenhouse gas reduction objectives, support sustainable land use patterns, strengthen communities, and facilitate affordable housing opportunities throughout the state. These investments may include catalytic investments that help establish the infrastructure foundation necessary to support future affordable housing growth and sustainable community development and investments that enhance, expand, or maximize the public benefit of existing transportation, climate, utility, affordable housing, and community-serving infrastructure assets. In administering the allocation, the council shall seek to reflect the differing needs, opportunities, and development patterns of communities throughout the state.

(2) In the initial program guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 75215, the council shall establish allocation targets intended to support all of the following:

(A) Catalytic infrastructure investments that facilitate future affordable housing growth and sustainable community development.

(B) Investments that enhance, expand, or maximize the public benefit of existing affordable housing, transportation, climate, and community infrastructure investments.

(C) Complementary infrastructure and community improvement investments associated with affordable housing developments funded through the program. Funding under the target established pursuant to this subparagraph may be provided for investments occurring subsequent to an affordable housing award and may
 support completed, underway, or newly awarded affordable housing developments. Participation under the target established pursuant to this subparagraph shall be optional and is intended to provide an additional pathway for affordable housing developments to receive complementary infrastructure and community improvement investments that improve resident access, strengthen community infrastructure, support sustainable land use patterns, and further greenhouse gas reduction objectives.

(3) Receipt of an AHSC Housing Allocation award shall not require a corresponding application for, or award of, AHSC Sustainable Communities Allocation funding.

(4) In awarding funds under the AHSC Sustainable Communities Allocation, the council shall provide additional consideration to projects that serve, support, enhance, or are located near affordable housing developments that have received funding
 through the AHSC Housing Allocation, are funded and underway, or are planned pursuant to an AHSC Housing Allocation award or other state, regional, or local affordable housing programs that advance housing affordability and sustainable land use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 32.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75210.2.

(a) In establishing and administering the allocation targets pursuant to Section 75210.1, the committee and the council shall balance the importance of maximizing the use and public benefit of existing sustainable infrastructure assets with supporting catalytic investments in underserved and emerging growth areas that can help establish the foundation for future affordable housing and sustainable community development.

(b) (1) The committee and the council shall periodically review and update the allocation targets described in subdivision (a) and related program priorities based on program outcomes, investment trends, greenhouse gas reduction benefits, housing production outcomes, infrastructure use, and other
 relevant factors that further the purposes of the program.

(2) The review and update conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall occur not less than once every four years and may be incorporated into program guideline updates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 33.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75210.3.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), on and after July 1, 2026, the committee shall administer the AHSC Housing Allocation for all solicitations and related applications, awards, and agreements initiated on or after that date.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the council shall retain authority and responsibility, until completion and closeout, to administer, manage, monitor, enforce, amend, including no-cost extensions, audit, and take all other actions necessary or convenient to carry out the terms of a legacy agreement.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the committee shall have primary responsibility for ongoing housing-related monitoring and
 compliance oversight for legacy agreements.

(c) The transfer of administration under subdivision (a) shall not impair the validity of a legacy agreement, and the rights and obligations of the parties to a legacy agreement shall continue in effect according to their terms.

(d) For purposes of administering a legacy agreement under subdivision (b), any reference in a legacy agreement to the committee or its predecessor shall be deemed to refer to the council, as appropriate to effectuate this section.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing July 1, 2026, all funding made available for the program pursuant to Section 39719 of the Health and Safety Code, including funds not otherwise obligated or that subsequently become available due to disencumbrance, shall be available for allocation
 and shall be administered in accordance with this part and with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to funds made available pursuant to the Round 10 notice of funding availability, except that any such funds that were previously obligated and are subsequently disencumbered shall be subject to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 34.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75211.

To be eligible for funding pursuant to the program, a project shall do all of the following:

(a) Demonstrate that it will achieve a reduction in greenhouse gas emissions.

(b) Support implementation of an adopted or draft sustainable communities strategy or, if a sustainable communities strategy is not required for a region by law, a regional plan that includes policies and programs to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

(c) Demonstrate consistency with the state planning priorities established pursuant to Section 65041.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 21.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

75212.

(a) For notices of funding availability released before June 30, 2026, projects eligible for funding pursuant to the program include any of the following:

(1) Intermodal, affordable rental or owner-occupied housing projects that support infill and compact development.

(2) Transit capital projects and programs supporting transit ridership, including water-borne transit.

(3) Active transportation capital projects that qualify under the Active Transportation Program, including pedestrian and bicycle facilities and supportive infrastructure, including connectivity to transit stations.

(4) Noninfrastructure-related active transportation projects that qualify under the Active Transportation Program, including activities that encourage active transportation goals conducted in conjunction with infrastructure improvement projects.

(5) Transit-oriented development projects, including affordable rental or owner-occupied housing and infrastructure at or near transit stations or connecting those developments to transit stations.

(6) Capital projects that implement local complete streets programs.

(7) Other projects or programs designed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and other criteria air pollutants by reducing automobile trips and vehicle miles traveled within a community.

(8) Acquisition of easements or other approaches or tools that protect agricultural lands that are under pressure of being converted to nonagricultural uses, particularly those adjacent to areas most at risk of urban or suburban sprawl or those of special environmental significance.

(9) Planning to support implementation of a sustainable communities strategy, including implementation of local plans supporting greenhouse gas emissions reduction efforts and promoting infill and compact development.

(b) For notices of funding availability released on or after July 1, 2026, projects eligible for funding pursuant to the program include any of the following:

(1) For the
 AHSC Housing Allocation, either of the following:

(A) Affordable rental and owner-occupied housing projects that support infill and compact development, including, but not limited to, transit-oriented development projects.

(B) Activities that support the development or implementation of projects described in subparagraph (A).

(2) For the AHSC Sustainable Communities Allocation, any of the following:

(A) Projects or programs designed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and other criteria air pollutants by reducing automobile trips and vehicle miles traveled within a community, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Transit, including transit capital projects supporting transit ridership.

(ii) Active transportation, including active transportation capital projects that qualify under the Active Transportation Program established pursuant to Section 2380 of the Streets and Highways Code, which includes pedestrian and bicycle facilities and supportive infrastructure.

(iii) Complete streets infrastructure.

(B) (i) Acquisition of easements or other approaches and tools that protect agricultural lands that are under pressure of being converted to nonagricultural uses, particularly those adjacent to areas most at risk of urban or suburban sprawl and those of special environmental significance.

(ii) In alignment with priorities set by the council and informed by interested parties, community members, and tribes, program awards made pursuant to this subparagraph shall make up not less than one-fifth and not more than one-third of the amounts awarded under
 this paragraph.

(C) Capacity, planning, and project development to support the implementation of a sustainable communities strategy or initiatives. This includes implementing local plans that support greenhouse gas emissions reduction efforts, promoting infill and compact development, and enhancing regional capacity, and infrastructure investments aligned with climate resilience goals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 35.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75212.1.

(a) In evaluating applications for AHSC Sustainable Communities Allocation funding, the council shall consider the extent to which proposed sustainable communities investments do any of the following:

(1) Facilitate the creation and preservation of affordable housing, improve resident access to transportation and other community amenities, support sustainable land use patterns, and advance greenhouse gas reduction objectives.

(2) Support planned affordable housing development in locations identified for residential growth, including sites and areas designated in adopted housing elements, specific plans, transit-oriented development plans, and other local planning
 documents.

(b) (1) In evaluating applications for AHSC Housing Allocation funding, the committee shall consider the extent to which a proposed project leverages existing public investments and advances location efficiency by providing residents access to transportation options, employment centers, services, educational opportunities, and community amenities.

(2) (A) The committee shall prioritize projects that incorporate sustainable communities features within the reasonable control of the project sponsor that improve mobility, connectivity, transportation choice, climate resilience, access to community resources, or other sustainable communities outcomes.

(B) Priority provided pursuant to this paragraph shall emphasize improvements integrated into, immediately adjacent
 to, or directly associated with, the project site.

(3) The committee shall not require project sponsors to finance or construct offsite infrastructure improvements that are not within the project sponsor’s reasonable control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 36.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75213.

A project eligible for funding pursuant to the program shall be encouraged to promote the objectives of Section 75210, and economic growth, reduce public fiscal costs, support civic partnerships and stakeholder engagement, and integrate and leverage existing housing, transportation, and land use programs and resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 21.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

75214.

In implementing the program, a program administrator shall support the goals established pursuant to Chapter 830 of the Statutes of 2012 by pursuing a programmatic goal of awarding 50 percent of program expenditure to projects benefiting disadvantaged communities, to the extent eligible applications are received. A program administrator shall coordinate outreach to promote access and program participation in disadvantaged communities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 37.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75215.

(a) Before awarding funds under the program, a program administrator shall develop guidelines and selection criteria for the implementation of the program, with coordination from relevant state entities as needed.

(b) Before adoption of the guidelines and the selection criteria, a program administrator shall conduct public outreach statewide.

(c) A program administrator shall publish its draft guidelines and selection criteria on its internet website at least 30 days before the public outreach.

(d) In adopting the guidelines and selection criteria, a program administrator shall consider the comments from local governments, regional agencies, and other stakeholders. A program administrator shall conduct outreach to disadvantaged communities to encourage comments on the draft guidelines from those communities.

(e) Specific to the AHSC Housing Allocation, the committee shall adopt guidelines or selection criteria that include affordable housing rental units and owner-occupied affordable housing units.

(f) Program guidelines may be revised by a program administrator to reflect changes in program focus or need. Outreach to stakeholders shall be conducted, pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) before changes to the guidelines are adopted.

(g) Upon the adoption of the guidelines and selection criteria, a program administrator shall, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, submit copies of the guidelines to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(h) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development and adoption of the guidelines and selection criteria pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 38.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75216.

(a) A program administrator shall leverage the programmatic and administrative expertise of relevant state departments and agencies in implementing the program.

(b) A program administrator shall coordinate with the metropolitan planning organizations and other regional agencies to identify and recommend projects within their respective jurisdictions that best reflect the goals and objectives of this division.

(c) The council and committee shall consult and collaborate with each other to promote alignment among state housing, land use, transportation, and climate initiatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 39.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75217.

The program administrators shall jointly report the progress on the implementation of the program, including each allocation, in an annual report required pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 75125. The report shall include an assessment of the system-level impacts of program investments, including how those investments enable or accelerate climate-friendly housing, transportation, and land use outcomes, and the direct, indirect, and cumulative effects of those investments in supporting greenhouse gas emissions reductions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 40.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75218.

For purposes of the AHSC Housing Allocation provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 75212, all of the following apply:

(a) For any loans issued pursuant to this chapter, principal and accumulated interest is due and payable upon completion of the term of the loan. The loan shall bear simple interest at the rate of 3 percent per annum on the unpaid principal balance. The committee shall require annual loan payments in the minimum amount necessary to cover the costs of project monitoring. For the first 30 years of the loan term, the amount of the required loan payments shall not exceed 0.42 percent per annum.

(b) All moneys received by the committee in repayment of loans made pursuant to this chapter, including interest and payments in advance in lieu of future interest, shall be deposited in the Housing Rehabilitation Loan Fund established by Section 50661 of the Health and Safety Code, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated to the Department of Housing and Community Development for the purposes of the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code), except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c) The committee may designate an amount not to exceed 1.5 percent of funds appropriated for use pursuant to this section for the purpose of curing or averting a default on the terms of any loan or other obligation by the recipient of financial assistance, or bidding at any foreclosure sale where the default or foreclosure sale would jeopardize the committee’s security in the rental housing development assisted pursuant to this chapter.  The funds so designated shall be known as the “default reserve.”

(d) The committee may use default reserve funds made available pursuant to this section to repair or maintain any rental housing development assisted pursuant to this chapter that was acquired to protect the committee’s security interest.

(e) The payment or advance of funds by the committee pursuant to this section shall be exclusively within the committee’s discretion, and no person shall be deemed to have any entitlement to the payment or advance of those funds. The amount of any funds expended by the committee for the purpose of curing or averting a default shall be added to the loan amount secured by the rental housing development and shall be payable to the committee upon demand.

(f) All moneys set aside for the default reserve by the committee pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Housing Rehabilitation Loan Fund established by Section 50661 of the Health and Safety Code, and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated to the committee for the purpose of the default reserve set forth above in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 41.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75218.1.

(a) For notices of funding availability released from July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2026, inclusive, in awarding funds under the program, the council shall provide additional points or preference to jurisdictions that have adopted a housing element that has been found by the Department of Housing and Community Development to be in substantial compliance with the requirements of Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code pursuant to Section 65585 of the Government Code and that are designated prohousing pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 65589.9 of the Government Code, in the manner determined by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 65589.9 of the Government Code.

(b) For notices of funding availability released on or after July 1, 2026, in awarding funds under the program, the program administrator shall provide additional points or preference to jurisdictions that have adopted a housing element that has been found by the Department of Housing and Community Development to be in substantial compliance with the requirements of Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code pursuant to Section 65585 of the Government Code and that are designated prohousing pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 65589.9 of the Government Code, in the manner determined by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 65589.9 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 42.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75218.2.

(a) For notices of funding availability released from July 1, 2022, to June 30, 2026, inclusive, the council may include guidelines or criteria for the award of funds to projects that provide home ownership opportunities for low-income individuals.

(b) For notices of funding availability within the AHSC Housing Allocation released on or after July 1, 2026, the committee may include guidelines or criteria for the award of funds to projects that provide home ownership opportunities for low-income individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 68, Sec. 43.   (AB 179)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program  [75220. - 75227.]

75220.

(a) The Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program is hereby created to fund transformative capital improvements that will modernize California’s intercity, commuter, and urban rail systems and bus and ferry transit systems to achieve all of the following policy objectives:

(1) Reduce emissions of greenhouse gases.

(2) Expand and improve transit service to increase ridership.

(3) Integrate the rail service of the state’s various rail operators, including integration with the high-speed rail system.

(4) Improve transit safety.

(b) The Transportation Agency shall evaluate applications consistent with the criteria set forth in this part and approve a multiyear program of projects for funding pursuant to Section 75224, which may be revised as necessary.

(c) The California Transportation Commission shall allocate funding to applicants pursuant to the program of projects approved by the Transportation Agency.

(d) The Department of Transportation may provide administrative support for the program.

(e) For purposes of this section, “transformative capital improvement” means a rail, bus, or ferry transit project that will significantly reduce vehicle miles traveled, congestion, and greenhouse gas emissions by creating a new transit system, increasing the capacity of an existing transit
 system, or otherwise significantly increasing the ridership of a transit system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 259, Sec. 8.   (SB 193)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75221.

(a) Projects eligible for funding under the program include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Rail capital projects, including acquisition of rail cars and locomotives, that expand, enhance, and improve existing rail systems and connectivity to existing and future transit systems, including the high-speed rail system.

(2) Intercity, commuter, and urban rail projects that increase service levels, improve reliability,
 or decrease travel times, including infrastructure access payments to host railroads in lieu of capital investments.

(3) Rail, bus, and ferry integration implementation, including integrated ticketing and scheduling systems, shared-use corridors, related planning efforts, and other service integration initiatives.

(4) Bus rapid transit and other bus and ferry transit investments to increase ridership and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

(b) In order to be eligible for funding under the program, a project shall demonstrate that it will achieve a reduction in emissions of greenhouse gases. In selecting projects for funding, the Transportation Agency shall consider the extent to which a project reduces emissions of greenhouse gases.

(c) The program shall have a programmatic goal of providing at least 25 percent of available funding to projects benefiting disadvantaged communities, consistent with the objectives of Chapter 830 of the Statutes of 2012.

(d) In evaluating grant applications for funding, the Transportation Agency shall consider all of the following:

(1) The cobenefits of projects that
 support the implementation of sustainable communities strategies through one or more of the following:

(A) Reducing vehicle miles traveled from automobiles and the number of automobile trips through growth in transit ridership.

(B) Promoting housing development in the vicinity of rail stations and major transit centers.

(C) Expanding existing rail and public
 transit systems.

(D) Enhancing the connectivity, integration, and coordination of the state’s various transit systems, including, but not limited to, regional and local transit systems and the high-speed rail system.

(E) Implementing clean vehicle technology.

(F) Promoting active transportation.

(G) Improving public health.

(2) The project priorities developed through the collaboration of two or more rail operators and any memoranda of understanding between state agencies and local or regional rail operators.

(3) Geographic equity.

(4) Consistency with an adopted sustainable communities strategy or, if a sustainable strategy is not required for a region by law, a regional plan that includes policies and programs to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases.

(5) The extent to which a project has supplemental funding committed to it from other nonstate sources.

(6) The extent to which the project will increase transit ridership.

(e) Eligible applicants under the program shall be public agencies, including joint powers agencies, that operate or have planning responsibility for existing or planned regularly scheduled intercity or commuter passenger rail service, urban rail transit service, or bus or
 ferry transit service.

(f) A recipient of moneys under the program may combine funding from the program with other state funding, including, but not limited to, the State Transportation Improvement Program, the Low Carbon Transit Operations Program, the State Air Resources Board clean vehicle program, and state transportation bond funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 710, Sec. 2.   (SB 9)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

75222.

(a) Applications for grants under the program shall be submitted to the Transportation Agency for evaluation in accordance with procedures and program guidelines approved by the agency. An eligible applicant may submit an application to the agency to fund a project over multiple fiscal years. The agency may make multiyear funding commitments for projects that are proposed by an eligible applicant to be funded from the program over a period of more than one fiscal year.

(b) The application shall define the project purpose, intended scope, proposed cost, intended funding sources, and schedule for project completion.

(c) The application shall specify the phases of work for which an eligible applicant is seeking an allocation of moneys from the program.

(d) The application shall identify the sources and timing of all
 moneys required to undertake and complete any phase of a project for which an eligible applicant is seeking an allocation of moneys from the program. The application shall also describe intended sources and timing of funding to complete any subsequent phases of the project, through construction or procurement.

(e) The application shall include information describing the funding sources and approach to ensuring that ongoing operating and maintenance costs of the project are funded through the useful life of the project, as applicable.

(f) Eligible applicants may submit more than one application for grants under the program pursuant to this section.

(g) An eligible applicant may use a project study report or equivalent document to demonstrate eligibility of a project for inclusion in the multiyear program of projects pursuant to Section 75224. The project study report or equivalent document shall, at a minimum, be adequate to define and justify the project scope, cost, and schedule for the project application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 710, Sec. 3.   (SB 9)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

75223.

(a) The Transportation Agency shall conduct at least two public workshops on draft program guidelines containing selection criteria prior to approval and shall post the draft guidelines on the agency’s Internet Web site at least 30 days prior to the first public workshop. Concurrent with the posting, the agency shall transmit the draft guidelines to the fiscal committees and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(b) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the development and approval of procedures and program guidelines for the program
 pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 710, Sec. 4.   (SB 9)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

75224.

(a) No later than July 1, 2018, the Transportation Agency shall approve a program of projects, which shall cover a period of five fiscal years, beginning with the 2018–19 fiscal year.

(b) The Transportation Agency shall approve each subsequent program of projects not later than April 1 of each even-numbered year. Each subsequent program shall cover a period of five fiscal years, beginning July 1 of the year of approval, and shall be a statement of intent by the Transportation Agency for the allocation and expenditure of moneys during those five fiscal years.

(c) In developing the program of projects, and consistent with the consideration of all other criteria for individual projects, the Transportation
 Agency shall seek to maximize the total amount of reductions in emissions of greenhouse gases that would be achieved under the program.

(d) For a project to be funded from the program over a period of more than one fiscal year, the Transportation Agency, at the request of an eligible applicant and in cooperation with the commission, shall enter into and execute a multiyear funding agreement with the eligible applicant for the project for an amount of program moneys and for any duration, as determined jointly by the agency and applicant.

(e) A regional transportation planning agency, as defined in Section 13987 of the Government Code, shall not be eligible to receive a grant under the Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program in the 2026–27 fiscal year or any subsequent fiscal years unless the Transportation Agency approves the regional transportation planning agency’s long-term
 financial plan submitted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13987 of the Government Code. The Transportation Agency shall update the guidelines approved pursuant to Section 75223 to reflect the eligibility limitation imposed pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 54, Sec. 4.   (SB 125)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

75225.

(a) A lead applicant agency may apply to the commission for a letter of no prejudice for a project or for any component of a project included in the program of projects approved by the Transportation Agency. If approved by the commission, the letter of no prejudice shall allow the lead applicant agency to expend its own moneys for the project or any component of the project and to be eligible for future reimbursement, as applicable, from moneys available for the program from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, created pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government
 Code, or from moneys available for the program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11053 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The amount expended under subdivision (a) shall be reimbursed by the state from moneys available for the program if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The project or project component for which the letter of no prejudice was requested has commenced, and the regional or local expenditures have been incurred.

(2) The expenditures made by the lead applicant agency are eligible for reimbursement in accordance with applicable laws and procedures. If expenditures made by the lead applicant agency are determined to be
 ineligible, the state has no obligation to reimburse those expenditures.
